Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2120
Project; conveyance of property for public use.

In carrying out a redevelopment project, an authority may: (1) Convey to the city in which the project is located, such real property as, in accordance with the redevelopment plan, is to be laid out into streets, alleys, and public ways; (2) grant servitudes, easements, and rights-of-way, for public utilities, sewers, streets, and other similar facilities, in accordance with the redevelopment plan; and (3) convey to the municipality, county, or other appropriate public body, such real property as, in accordance with the redevelopment plan, is to be used for parks, schools, public buildings, facilities, or other public purposes.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 7(3), p. 809;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1620;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2620.